Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 343.161 is amended to read:
343.161. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Abbreviated school day” means any school day  during which a student receives instruction
or educational services for  fewer hours than other students who are in the same grade within the
same school.
(b) “Abbreviated school day program” means an education program:
(A) In which a school district restricts a student’s access  to hours of instruction or educational
services;  and
(B) That results in a student having an abbreviated school day for more than  10 school days per
school year.
(c) “Foster youth” means a child or ward who is in the legal  custody of the Department
of Human Services as provided in ORS  418.015 or 419B.337 and who has been placed in sub-
stitute care.
[(c)] (d) “Parent” includes the  student, if the student is 18 years of age or older or is
emancipated pursuant to ORS 419B.550 to 419B.558.
[(d)] (e) “Unilaterally place” means a placement by a school district without the consent  of the
student’s parent , or, if the student is a foster youth, without the consent of  the student’s
foster parent and, if the student has a surrogate as defined in ORS 419A.004,  the consent of
the surrogate .
(2) A school district may not unilaterally place a student on  an abbreviated school day program,
regardless of the age of the student.
(3)(a) A school district may provide an abbreviated school day program to  a student only if the
student’s individualized education program team:
[(a)] (A) Determines that the student should be placed on an abbreviated school day program:
[(A)] (i) Based on the student’s needs; and
[(B)] (ii) After the opportunity for the student’s parents to meaningfully  participate in a meeting
to discuss the placement; and
[(b)] (B) Documents that the team considered at least one option that included appropriate
supports for the student and that could enable the student to access the  same number of hours of
Enrolled Senate Bill 475 (SB 475-A) Page 1
instruction or educational services  that are provided to students who are in the same grade within
the same school.
(b) In  addition to the requirements prescribed by paragraph (a) of this subsection, unless
otherwise ordered by a court, a school district may provide an abbreviated  school day pro-
gram to a student who is a foster youth only if:
(A) The student’s  individualized education program team provided the opportunity for the
student’s foster parent to meaningfully participate in a meeting to discuss the placement,
including the reasonable opportunity to physically attend the meeting at which  the abbrevi-
ated school day program is discussed; and
(B) The school district provides written notification to the foster parent that includes:
(i) A  statement informing the foster parent of the student’s presumptive right to receive
the same number of hours  of instruction or educational services as other students who are
in the same grade within the  same school and the foster parent’s right to request, at any
time, a meeting of the  individualized education program team to determine whether the
student should no longer be placed on an abbreviated school day program;
(ii) A statement that a school district  may not unilaterally place a student on an abbre-
viated school day program; and
(iii) A statement  summarizing the documentation described in paragraph (a)(B) of this
subsection.
(4) If a student  is placed on an abbreviated school day program, the school district shall, at least
once each term:
(a) Provide the following information in writing to the parent  or foster parent  of the student:
(A) The school district’s duty to comply with the requirements of this section;
(B) The prohibition against a school district unilaterally placing a student  on an abbreviated
school day program; and
(C) The student’s presumptive right to receive the same  number of hours of instruction or edu-
cational services as other students who are in the same grade within  the same school and the
parent’s or foster parent’s  right to request, at any time, a meeting of the individualized  education
program team to determine whether the student should no longer be placed on an abbreviated school
day program.
(b) Obtain a signed acknowledgment from the parent  or foster parent  of the  student that the
parent or foster parent  received the information described in paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(c) Include in the student’s individualized education program a written statement that  explains
the reasons the student was placed on an abbreviated school day program.
(5) This section does not apply to:
(a) Any abbreviated school days that are a component of discipline imposed in compliance with
ORS 339.250;
(b) A student who will be eligible to complete the requirements for a diploma or  certificate un-
der ORS 329.451 during the school year if the student, and the parent of the student, agree to the
abbreviated school day program; or
(c) A student whose parent has notified an education service district that the student  is being
taught by a parent, legal guardian or private teacher under ORS 339.035.
SECTION 2.
The amendments to ORS 343.161 by section 1 of this 2019 Act apply to stu-
dents placed on an abbreviated  school day program on or after the effective date of this 2019
Act.
Enrolled Senate Bill 475 (SB 475-A) Page 2
Passed by Senate April 18, 2019
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House May 30, 2019
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Bev Clarno, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 475 (SB 475-A) Page 3